Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.992, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Uses of school library aid. School library aid must be reserved and used for directly funding the costs of the following purposes within a new text begin school new text end librarynew text begin or school library media center, as defined in section 124D.991new text end : (1) the salaries and benefits of a school library media specialist; deleted text begin (2) electronic, computer, and audiovisual equipment; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) information technology infrastructure and digital tools; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end electronic and material resources; or deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end furniture, equipment, or supplies. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end